Utah statutes.
16-6a-1014.   Amendment terminating members or redeeming or canceling memberships.

(1)  An amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a nonprofit corporation shall meet the requirements of this chapter and this section if the amendment would:

(a)  terminate all members or any class of members; or

(b)  redeem or cancel all memberships or any class of memberships.

(2)  Before adopting a resolution proposing an amendment as described in Subsection (1), the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation shall give notice of the general nature of the amendment to the members.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

